Montana, session 2025, LC2220.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Warrantless surveillance prohibited -- surveillance stalking --
definition. (1) Surveillance without a warrant or reasonable suspicion that a crime has been, is being, or will
soon be committed is prohibited within the boundaries of the state.
(2) A federal, state, or local law enforcement agency or officer may not surveil a person within the
boundaries of the state without a warrant or reasonable suspicion that a crime has been, is being, or will soon
be committed.
(3) A law enforcement officer who surveils a person within the boundaries of the state without a
warrant or articulable reasonable suspicion that a crime has been, is being, or will soon be committed is guilty
of surveillance stalking. A person convicted of the offense of surveillance stalking shall be imprisoned in the
state prison for a term not to exceed 1 year or be fined an amount not to exceed $1,000, or both.
(4) As used in this section, "surveil" means to monitor or record the statements, movements, or
activities of a person in real time.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Severability. If a part of [this act] is invalid, all valid parts that are
severable from the invalid part remain in effect. If a part of [this act] is invalid in one or more of its applications,
the part remains in effect in all valid applications that are severable from the invalid applications.
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – ****